apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_vb.en.dix
<pardef n="st/and__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>and</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ands</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ood</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ood</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anding</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anding</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anding</l>
          <r>and<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>    
    
<pardef n="occur__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>red</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>red</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ring</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ring</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ring</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>        
    
<pardef n="outbid__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ding</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="r/un__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uns</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>un</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unning</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unning</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unning</l>
          <r>un<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>     
    
<pardef n="outsh/ine__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ine</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ines</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>one</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ining</l>
          <r>ine<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="sho/ot__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ot</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ots</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oting</l>
          <r>ot<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>  
    
<pardef n="plan__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ned</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ned</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ning</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
<pardef n="prov/e__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    

<e lm="plan"><i>plan</i><par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prove"><i>prov</i><par n="prov/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="run"><i>r</i><par n="r/un__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stand"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="understand"><i>underst</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/></e>
  <e lm="stand up"><i>st</i><par n="st/and__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="pin"><i>pin</i> <par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confer"><i>confer</i> <par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shoot"><i>sho</i> <par n="sho/ot__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="deter"><i>deter</i> <par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sin"><i>sin</i> <par n="plan__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prefer"><i>prefer</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stir"><i>stir</i> <par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stir up"><i>stir up</i><par n="occur__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="clutter"><i>clutter</i><par n="occur__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="scan"><i>scan</i><par n="plan__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="blur"><i>blur</i><par n="occur__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="rive"><i>riv</i><par n="prov/e__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="char"><i>char</i><par n="occur__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="spur"><i>spur</i><par n="occur__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="fan"><i>fan</i><par n="plan__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="shun"><i>shun</i><par n="plan__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="infer"><i>infer</i><par n="occur__vblex" /></e>
